lib/uk_UA.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY оаниітврсулдкмпяьзчбегхшжєйїцюфщґОАНИІТВРСУЛДКМПЯЬЗЧБЕГХШЖЄЙЇЦЮФЩҐ-'
MAP 1
MAP гґ
WORDCHARS -ʼ'`
BREAK 1
BREAK -
IGNORE ́
ICONV 64
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ’ '
ICONV a 0
ICONV b 0
ICONV c 0
ICONV d 0
ICONV e 0
ICONV f 0
ICONV g 0
ICONV h 0
ICONV i 0
ICONV j 0
ICONV k 0
ICONV l 0
ICONV m 0
ICONV n 0
ICONV o 0
ICONV p 0
ICONV q 0
ICONV r 0
ICONV s 0
ICONV t 0
ICONV u 0
ICONV v 0
ICONV x 0
ICONV w 0
ICONV y 0
ICONV z 0
ICONV A 0
ICONV B 0
ICONV C 0
ICONV D 0
ICONV E 0
ICONV F 0
ICONV G 0
ICONV H 0
ICONV I 0
ICONV J 0
ICONV K 0
ICONV L 0
ICONV M 0
ICONV N 0
ICONV O 0
ICONV P 0
ICONV Q 0
ICONV R 0
ICONV S 0
ICONV T 0
ICONV U 0
ICONV V 0
ICONV X 0
ICONV W 0
ICONV Y 0
ICONV Z 0
ICONV é 0
ICONV ô 0
ICONV ï 0
ICONV ü 0
ICONV ç 0
ICONV ñ 0
ICONV ß 0
ICONV ë 0
ICONV ä 0
ICONV ö 0

SFX ! Y 3
SFX ! ь е ь
SFX ! 0 е [бм]
SFX ! 0 е [вжрфчшщ]
SFX " Y 18
SFX " день ня день
SFX " тень ня тень
SFX " 0 я [аиуео]р
SFX " 0 а яр
SFX " оєць ійця боєць
SFX " осен існа осен
SFX " вець евця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]вець
SFX " нець енця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець
SFX " рець ерця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]рець
SFX " елок ілка елок
SFX " овець івця овець
SFX " одець ідця одець
SFX " онець інця онець
SFX " ід ьода лід
SFX " іл ьола ліл
SFX " ін ьона лін
SFX " ір ьора лір
SFX " іт ьота літ
SFX $ Y 21
SFX $ 0 і [жчшщ]
SFX $ й ї й
SFX $ й їв й
SFX $ й ям й
SFX $ й ями й
SFX $ й ях й
SFX $ 0 ів [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ 0 ам [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ 0 ами [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ 0 ах [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ ь і ь
SFX $ ь ів ь
SFX $ ь ям ь
SFX $ ь ями ь
SFX $ ь ях ь
SFX $ о и о
SFX $ о ів о
SFX $ о ам о
SFX $ о ами о
SFX $ о ах о
SFX $ 0 и [^аєиіїйоуьюяжчшщ]
SFX % Y 17
SFX % кка цці кка
SFX % а і [жчшщ]а
SFX % а ею [жчшщ]а
SFX % ха сі ха
SFX % я і [^іІйеиаоу'ь]я
SFX % я ею [^іІйеиаоу'ь]я
SFX % а и [^жчшщ]а
SFX % а ою [^жчшщ]а
SFX % я ю я
SFX % а у а
SFX % я ї ['ьйіІеиаоу]я
SFX % я єю ['ьйіІеиаоу]я
SFX % а і [^гГґкхжчшщ]а
SFX % га зі га
SFX % Га Зі Га
SFX % ґа дзі ґа
SFX % ка ці [^к]ка
SFX & Y 2
SFX & е і ще
SFX & е ею ще
SFX ' Y 3
SFX ' ий ім ий
SFX ' ій ім ій
SFX ' е ім е
SFX ( Y 85
SFX ( день ні день
SFX ( тень ні тень
SFX ( день нів день
SFX ( тень нів тень
SFX ( день ням день
SFX ( тень ням тень
SFX ( день нями день
SFX ( тень нями тень
SFX ( день нях день
SFX ( тень нях тень
SFX ( 0 і яр
SFX ( 0 ів яр
SFX ( 0 ам яр
SFX ( 0 ами яр
SFX ( 0 ах яр
SFX ( оєць ійці оєць
SFX ( оєць ійців боєць
SFX ( оєць ійцям боєць
SFX ( оєць ійцями боєць
SFX ( оєць ійцях боєць
SFX ( 0 і [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ів [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ям [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ями [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ях [аеиоу]р
SFX ( елок ілки елок
SFX ( елок ілків елок
SFX ( елок ілкам елок
SFX ( елок ілками елок
SFX ( елок ілках елок
SFX ( овець івці овець
SFX ( одець ідці одець
SFX ( онець інці онець
SFX ( овець івців овець
SFX ( одець ідців одець
SFX ( онець інців онець
SFX ( овець івцям овець
SFX ( одець ідцям одець
SFX ( онець інцям онець
SFX ( овець івцями овець
SFX ( одець ідцями одець
SFX ( онець інцями онець
SFX ( овець івцях овець
SFX ( одець ідцях одець
SFX ( онець інцях онець
SFX ( вець евці [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енці [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерці [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евців [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енців [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерців [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евцям [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енцям [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерцям [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евцями [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енцями [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерцями [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евцях [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енцях [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерцях [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( ід ьоди лід
SFX ( іл ьоли ліл
SFX ( ін ьони лін
SFX ( ір ьори лір
SFX ( іт ьоти літ
SFX ( ід ьодів лід
SFX ( іл ьолів ліл
SFX ( ін ьонів лін
SFX ( ір ьорів лір
SFX ( іт ьотів літ
SFX ( ід ьодам лід
SFX ( іл ьолам ліл
SFX ( ін ьонам лін
SFX ( ір ьорам лір
SFX ( іт ьотам літ
SFX ( ід ьодами лід
SFX ( іл ьолами ліл
SFX ( ін ьонами лін
SFX ( ір ьорами лір
SFX ( іт ьотами літ
SFX ( ід ьодах лід
SFX ( іл ьолах ліл
SFX ( ін ьонах лін
SFX ( ір ьорах лір
SFX ( іт ьотах літ
SFX ) Y 1
SFX ) ік оці ік
SFX * Y 2
SFX * атися учись жатися
SFX * ати учи жати
SFX + Y 3
SFX + їй йо їй
SFX + ій ьо ій
SFX + ий о [^жшщ]ий
SFX , Y 5
SFX , г зі г
SFX , г зів г
SFX , г зям г
SFX , г зями г
SFX , г зях г
SFX - Y 17
SFX - 0 ей [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ам [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ами [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ах [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 і ф
SFX - 0 ей ф
SFX - 0 ям ф
SFX - 0 ями ф
SFX - 0 ях ф
SFX - 0 ей [ау]р
SFX - 0 ям [ау]р
SFX - 0 ями [ау]р
SFX - 0 ях [ау]р
SFX - ь ей ь
SFX - ь ям ь
SFX - ь ями ь
SFX - ь ях ь
SFX . Y 5
SFX . е а ще
SFX . е 0 ще
SFX . е ам ще
SFX . е ами ще
SFX . е ах ще
SFX 0 Y 116
SFX 0 іб обі .іб
SFX 0 ів ові .ів
SFX 0 ід оді .ід
SFX 0 іж ожі .іж
SFX 0 із озі .із
SFX 0 іл олі .іл
SFX 0 ім омі .ім
SFX 0 ін оні .ін
SFX 0 іп опі .іп
SFX 0 ір орі .ір
SFX 0 іс осі .іс
SFX 0 іт оті .іт
SFX 0 іш оші .іш
SFX 0 ій ою ій
SFX 0 ій оєві ій
SFX 0 ій оєм ій
SFX 0 ій ої ій
SFX 0 ізд озді ізд
SFX 0 ізт озті ізт
SFX 0 ірд орді ірд
SFX 0 ірт орті ірт
SFX 0 ісд осді ісд
SFX 0 іст ості іст
SFX 0 ізд озду ізд
SFX 0 ізк озку ізк
SFX 0 ізт озту ізт
SFX 0 ірд орду ірд
SFX 0 ірк орку ірк
SFX 0 ірт орту ірт
SFX 0 ісд осду ісд
SFX 0 іск оску іск
SFX 0 іст осту іст
SFX 0 ізд оздові ізд
SFX 0 ізк озкові ізк
SFX 0 ізт озтові ізт
SFX 0 ірд ордові ірд
SFX 0 ірк оркові ірк
SFX 0 ірт ортові ірт
SFX 0 ісд осдові ісд
SFX 0 іск оскові іск
SFX 0 іст остові іст
SFX 0 ізд оздом ізд
SFX 0 ізк озком ізк
SFX 0 ізт озтом ізт
SFX 0 ірд ордом ірд
SFX 0 ірк орком ірк
SFX 0 ірт ортом ірт
SFX 0 ісд осдом ісд
SFX 0 іск оском іск
SFX 0 іст остом іст
SFX 0 іб обові іб
SFX 0 ід одові ід
SFX 0 іг огові іг
SFX 0 із озові із
SFX 0 ік окові ік
SFX 0 іл олові іл
SFX 0 ім омові ім
SFX 0 ін онові ін
SFX 0 іп опові іп
SFX 0 ір орові ір
SFX 0 іс осові іс
SFX 0 іт отові іт
SFX 0 ік оці рік
SFX 0 ік оці потік
SFX 0 іж ожу іж
SFX 0 іш ошу іш
SFX 0 іж ожем іж
SFX 0 іш ошем іш
SFX 0 іж ожеві іж
SFX 0 іш ошеві іш
SFX 0 інь оню інь
SFX 0 інь оневі інь
SFX 0 інь онем інь
SFX 0 інь оні інь
SFX 0 іль олю іль
SFX 0 іль олеві іль
SFX 0 іль олем іль
SFX 0 іль олі іль
SFX 0 іб обу іб
SFX 0 ів ову ів
SFX 0 ід оду ід
SFX 0 іг огу іг
SFX 0 із озу із
SFX 0 ік оку ік
SFX 0 іл олу іл
SFX 0 ім ому ім
SFX 0 ін ону ін
SFX 0 іп опу іп
SFX 0 ір ору ір
SFX 0 іс осу іс
SFX 0 іт оту іт
SFX 0 іч очу іч
SFX 0 іб обом іб
SFX 0 ів овом ів
SFX 0 ід одом ід
SFX 0 іг огом іг
SFX 0 із озом із
SFX 0 ік оком ік
SFX 0 іл олом іл
SFX 0 ім омом ім
SFX 0 ін оном ін
SFX 0 іп опом іп
SFX 0 ір ором ір
SFX 0 іс осом іс
SFX 0 іт отом іт
SFX 0 іч очом іч
SFX 0 ік оці стік
SFX 0 івш овшу івш
SFX 0 івш овшеві івш
SFX 0 івш овшем івш
SFX 0 івш овші івш
SFX 0 ість остю ість
SFX 0 ість остеві ість
SFX 0 ість остем ість
SFX 0 ість ості ість
SFX 0 іг озі іг
SFX 1 Y 24
SFX 1 ьо я ьо
SFX 1 ьо ю ьо
SFX 1 ьо еві ьо
SFX 1 ьо ем ьо
SFX 1 ьо і ьо
SFX 1 0 еві [жчшщ]
SFX 1 0 ем [жчшщ]
SFX 1 о а [^ь]о
SFX 1 о у [^ь]о
SFX 1 о ові [^ь]о
SFX 1 о ом [^ь]о
SFX 1 о і [^кь]о
SFX 1 й ю й
SFX 1 й єві й
SFX 1 й єм й
SFX 1 й ї й
SFX 1 0 ові [^аеєиійоуьюяжчшщ]
SFX 1 0 ом [^аеєиійоуьюяжчшщ]
SFX 1 0 і [^аеєиійоуьюягґкх]
SFX 1 0 у [^аеєиійоуьюя]
SFX 1 ь ю ь
SFX 1 ь еві ь
SFX 1 ь ем ь
SFX 1 ь і ь
SFX 2 Y 62
SFX 2 іб ебу іб
SFX 2 іл елу іл
SFX 2 ін ену ін
SFX 2 іп епу іп
SFX 2 ір еру ір
SFX 2 іс есу іс
SFX 2 іт ету іт
SFX 2 іб ебові іб
SFX 2 іл елові іл
SFX 2 ін енові ін
SFX 2 іп епові іп
SFX 2 ір ерові ір
SFX 2 іс есові іс
SFX 2 іт етові іт
SFX 2 іб ебом іб
SFX 2 іл елом іл
SFX 2 ін еном ін
SFX 2 іп епом іп
SFX 2 ір ером ір
SFX 2 іс есом іс
SFX 2 іт етом іт
SFX 2 іб ебі іб
SFX 2 іл елі іл
SFX 2 ін ені ін
SFX 2 іп епі іп
SFX 2 ір ері ір
SFX 2 іс есі іс
SFX 2 іт еті іт
SFX 2 ій ею ій
SFX 2 ій еєві ій
SFX 2 ій еєм ій
SFX 2 ій еї ій
SFX 2 ідь едю ідь
SFX 2 іль елю іль
SFX 2 інь еню інь
SFX 2 ідь едеві ідь
SFX 2 іль елеві іль
SFX 2 інь еневі інь
SFX 2 ідь едем ідь
SFX 2 іль елем іль
SFX 2 інь енем інь
SFX 2 ідь еді ідь
SFX 2 іль елі іль
SFX 2 інь ені інь
SFX 2 іж ежу іж
SFX 2 іш ешу іш
SFX 2 іж ежеві іж
SFX 2 іш ешеві іш
SFX 2 іж ежем іж
SFX 2 іш ешем іш
SFX 2 іж ежі іж
SFX 2 іш еші іш
SFX 2 їв єву їв
SFX 2 їв євом їв
SFX 2 їв єві їв
SFX 2 ів еву ів
SFX 2 ів евом ів
SFX 2 ів еві ів
SFX 2 іг егу іг
SFX 2 іг егові іг
SFX 2 іг егом іг
SFX 2 іг езі іг
SFX 3 Y 110
SFX 3 ов ву ов
SFX 3 ок ку ок
SFX 3 ол лу ол
SFX 3 ом му ом
SFX 3 он ну он
SFX 3 ор ру ор
SFX 3 ов вом ов
SFX 3 ок ком ок
SFX 3 ол лом ол
SFX 3 ом мом ом
SFX 3 он ном он
SFX 3 ор ром ор
SFX 3 ей 'ю ей
SFX 3 ей 'єві ей
SFX 3 ей 'єм ей
SFX 3 ей 'ї ей
SFX 3 ок кові ок
SFX 3 ол лові ол
SFX 3 ом мові ом
SFX 3 он нові он
SFX 3 ор рові ор
SFX 3 ов ві ов
SFX 3 ол лі ол
SFX 3 ом мі ом
SFX 3 он ні он
SFX 3 ор рі ор
SFX 3 ень ьню лень
SFX 3 ець ьцю лець
SFX 3 ень ьневі лень
SFX 3 ець ьцеві лець
SFX 3 ень ьнем лень
SFX 3 ець ьцем лець
SFX 3 ень ьні лень
SFX 3 ець ьці лець
SFX 3 єць йцю єць
SFX 3 єць йцеві єць
SFX 3 єць йцем єць
SFX 3 єць йці єць
SFX 3 ел лу ел
SFX 3 ем му ем
SFX 3 ен ну ен
SFX 3 ер ру ер
SFX 3 ес су ес
SFX 3 ет ту ет
SFX 3 ел лові ел
SFX 3 ем мові ем
SFX 3 ен нові ен
SFX 3 ер рові ер
SFX 3 ес сові ес
SFX 3 ет тові ет
SFX 3 ел лом ел
SFX 3 ем мом ем
SFX 3 ен ном ен
SFX 3 ер ром ер
SFX 3 ес сом ес
SFX 3 ет том ет
SFX 3 ел лі ел
SFX 3 ем мі ем
SFX 3 ен ні ен
SFX 3 ер рі ер
SFX 3 ес сі ес
SFX 3 ет ті ет
SFX 3 іль лю [^л]іль
SFX 3 інь ню [^л]інь
SFX 3 іть тю [^л]іть
SFX 3 іць цю [^л]іць
SFX 3 ель лю [^л]ель
SFX 3 ень ню [^л]ень
SFX 3 еть тю [^л]еть
SFX 3 ець цю [^л]ець
SFX 3 оль лю [^л]оль
SFX 3 онь ню [^л]онь
SFX 3 оть тю [^л]оть
SFX 3 оць цю [^л]оць
SFX 3 іль леві [^л]іль
SFX 3 інь неві [^л]інь
SFX 3 іть теві [^л]іть
SFX 3 іць цеві [^л]іць
SFX 3 ель леві [^л]ель
SFX 3 ень неві [^л]ень
SFX 3 еть теві [^л]еть
SFX 3 ець цеві [^л]ець
SFX 3 оль леві [^л]оль
SFX 3 онь неві [^л]онь
SFX 3 оть теві [^л]оть
SFX 3 оць цеві [^л]оць
SFX 3 іль лем [^л]іль
SFX 3 інь нем [^л]інь
SFX 3 іть тем [^л]іть
SFX 3 іць цем [^л]іць
SFX 3 ель лем [^л]ель
SFX 3 ень нем [^л]ень
SFX 3 еть тем [^л]еть
SFX 3 ець цем [^л]ець
SFX 3 оль лем [^л]оль
SFX 3 онь нем [^л]онь
SFX 3 оть тем [^л]оть
SFX 3 оць цем [^л]оць
SFX 3 іль лі [^л]іль
SFX 3 інь ні [^л]інь
SFX 3 іть ті [^л]іть
SFX 3 іць ці [^л]іць
SFX 3 ель лі [^л]ель
SFX 3 ень ні [^л]ень
SFX 3 еть ті [^л]еть
SFX 3 ець ці [^л]ець
SFX 3 оль лі [^л]оль
SFX 3 онь ні [^л]онь
SFX 3 оть ті [^л]оть
SFX 3 оць ці [^л]оць
SFX 4 Y 71
SFX 4 рець ерцю [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець
SFX 4 вець евцю [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець
SFX 4 нець енцю [^аеєиіїоуюя]нець
SFX 4 рець ерцеві [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець
SFX 4 вець евцеві [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець
SFX 4 нець енцеві [^аеєиіїоуюя]нець
SFX 4 рець ерцем [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець
SFX 4 вець евцем [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець
SFX 4 нець енцем [^аеєиіїоуюя]нець
SFX 4 рець ерці [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець
SFX 4 вець евці [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець
SFX 4 нець енці [^аеєиіїоуюя]нець
SFX 4 0 у яр
SFX 4 0 еві яр
SFX 4 0 ем яр
SFX 4 0 і яр
SFX 4 оєць ійцю боєць
SFX 4 оєць ійцеві боєць
SFX 4 оєць ійці боєць
SFX 4 оєць ійцем боєць
SFX 4 осен існу осен
SFX 4 осен існові осен
SFX 4 осен існі осен
SFX 4 осен існом осен
SFX 4 0 ю [аеиоу]р
SFX 4 0 еві [аеиоу]р
SFX 4 0 ем [аеиоу]р
SFX 4 0 і [аеиоу]р
SFX 4 тень ню тень
SFX 4 день ню день
SFX 4 тень неві тень
SFX 4 день неві день
SFX 4 тень ні тень
SFX 4 день ні день
SFX 4 тень нем тень
SFX 4 день нем день
SFX 4 елок ілку елок
SFX 4 елок ілкові елок
SFX 4 елок ілком елок
SFX 4 овець івцю овець
SFX 4 одець ідцю одець
SFX 4 онець інцю онець
SFX 4 овець івцеві овець
SFX 4 одець ідцеві одець
SFX 4 онець інцеві онець
SFX 4 овець івцем овець
SFX 4 одець ідцем одець
SFX 4 онець інцем онець
SFX 4 овець івці овець
SFX 4 одець ідці одець
SFX 4 онець інці онець
SFX 4 ід ьоду лід
SFX 4 іл ьолу ліл
SFX 4 ін ьону лін
SFX 4 ір ьору лір
SFX 4 іт ьоту літ
SFX 4 ід ьодові лід
SFX 4 іл ьолові ліл
SFX 4 ін ьонові лін
SFX 4 ір ьорові лір
SFX 4 іт ьотові літ
SFX 4 ід ьодом лід
SFX 4 іл ьолом ліл
SFX 4 ін ьоном лін
SFX 4 ір ьором лір
SFX 4 іт ьотом літ
SFX 4 ід ьоді лід
SFX 4 іл ьолі ліл
SFX 4 ін ьоні лін
SFX 4 ір ьорі лір
SFX 4 іт ьоті літ
SFX 5 Y 2
SFX 5 ити 'ючи вити
SFX 5 итися 'ючись витися
